Utah statutes.
63M-7-603.   Duties.
(1)  The council shall:
(a)  make recommendations to the Legislature, the governor, and the Judicial
Council on the following:
(i)  enforcing existing rights of victims of crime;
(ii)  enhancing rights of victims of crime;
(iii)  the role of victims of crime in the criminal justice system;
(iv)  victim restitution;
(v)  educating and training criminal justice professionals on the rights of
victims of crime; and
(vi)  enhancing services to victims of crimes;
(b)  provide training on the rights of victims of crime; and
(c)  establish a subcommittee to consider complaints not resolved by the
Victims' Rights Committee established in Section 77-37-5.
(2)  The council shall advocate the adoption, repeal, or modification of laws
or proposed legislation in the interest of victims of crime.
(3)  The council may establish additional subcommittees to assist in
accomplishing its duties.
